Hawaii statutes.
§334-132 Objection to discharge. (a)
If any person specified as entitled to receive notice files a written objection
with the family court on the grounds that the subject of the order is a proper
subject for assisted community treatment, the family court shall conduct a
hearing to determine if the subject of the order still meets the criteria for
assisted community treatment in section 334-121. The hearing shall be
conducted as provided under section 334‑134.

(b) If the family court finds that the subject
of the order continues to meet the criteria for assisted community treatment in
section 334-121, the family court shall order the subject to continue the
treatment for the unexpired period of its earlier order.

(c) If the family court finds that the subject
of the order does not meet the criteria for assisted community treatment in
section 334-121, the court shall dismiss the objection and order the early
discharge of the subject. [L 1984, c 251, pt of §1; am L 2013, c 221, §§18, 24;
am L 2016, c 114, §6]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next